Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 10
COLORADO OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP INITIATIVE

23-3.3-1001. Legislative declaration - repeal.

The general assembly hereby declares that the Colorado opportunity scholarship initiative created in this part 10 is intended to:

Award scholarships or grants based upon a rigor-based method that emphasizes student commitment to academic achievement and successful placement in the workforce and ensuring that participating students and institutions be held accountable through measurable outcomes; and

Develop the connections and community partnerships necessary to ensure that every Colorado student has the support needed to enter a postsecondary opportunity, persist and succeed, and enter his or her desired position in the workforce.

It is the intent of the general assembly to match nonprofit and private financial contributions to the Colorado opportunity scholarship initiative with annual contributions from the general fund so that a sustainable corpus is created to fund scholarship awards in future years. Whenever practicable, the annual match should be in an amount that is significant enough to attract continued investment by community partners.

The general assembly further declares that:

The COVID-19 pandemic has caused significant disruption to the lives of students and their families, the operations of the public institutions of higher education in Colorado, and the state's workforce and economy;

While the pandemic has affected the entire state, it has disproportionately impacted low-income families and communities of color, exacerbating systemic economic inequities;

The crisis has had a disproportionate impact on front-line workers, those who earn low wages, and those who lack a postsecondary credential or degree; and

An equitable economic recovery from the pandemic depends on having robust pathways for workers to obtain new skills, earn higher wages, and be prepared for the in-demand careers of the future.

The general assembly therefore finds that it is an appropriate, necessary, and lawful use of the money received through the federal "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021", Pub.L. 117-2, to appropriate a portion of said money to the Colorado opportunity scholarship initiative to address the significant decline in enrollment in the public institutions of higher education, high rates of job loss, and continuing unemployment and the overall disruption to the workforce caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, which has resulted in significant economic harm to individuals and businesses, by quickly and effectively providing support for students to return to the public institutions of higher education to complete their postsecondary credentials and help to rebuild and revitalize the workforce of Colorado and by assisting students to complete the free application for federal student aid and the Colorado application for state financial aid.

It is the intent of the general assembly that institutions use the allocations distributed pursuant to section 23-3.3-1006 to provide direct and indirect support to students to re-enroll and complete postsecondary credentials. It is further the general assembly's intent that the institutions provide this direct and indirect student support through programs that incentivize students to return and complete degree and credential programs, assist students in navigating their options for how to return and complete degrees and credentials efficiently, address equity gaps in higher education and the workforce, provide training for industry-recognized certificates and skill development for traditional and non-traditional students and members of the workforce, support workforce development for significantly impacted job sectors, and support and improve overall student success in completing postsecondary credentials and entering the workforce.

This subsection (3) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1384), ch. 347, p. 1554, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2021:

(3) added, (HB 21-1330), ch. 377, p. 2493, § 2, effective June 29.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1330, see section 1 of chapter 377, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-3.3-1002. Definitions. As used in this part 10, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the Colorado opportunity scholarship initiative advisory board created in section 23-3.3-1004.

(1.5) "Cost of attendance" means the student's cost of attending an institution of higher education that is determined by the institution of higher education based on federal and commission policy, and includes tuition, fees, room, board, books, supplies, transportation, and other allowable expenses.

"Department" means the department of higher education created pursuant to section 24-1-114, C.R.S.

"Director" means the director of the initiative.

"Executive director" means the executive director of the Colorado commission on higher education.

(4.3) "Expected family contribution" means the amount of money that a student's family is expected to contribute to the student's cost of attendance at an institution of higher education.

(4.7) "Financial assistance" means money awarded to a student based on the student's cost of attendance at the institution of higher education.

"Fund" means the Colorado opportunity scholarship initiative fund created in section 23-3.3-1005.

"Initiative" means the Colorado opportunity scholarship initiative created in section 23-3.3-1003.

"Nonprofit organization" means a tax-exempt charitable or social welfare organization operating under section 501 (c)(3) or 501 (c)(4) of title 26 of the United States Code, the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended.

"Precollegiate organization" means a state- or federally funded program offering postsecondary workforce-ready options to Colorado students.

Repealed.

"Work-based learning" has the same meaning as set forth in section 8-83-601 (15).

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1384), ch. 347, p. 1555, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2020:

(1.5), (4.3), and (4.7) added and (9) repealed, (SB 20-006), ch. 26, p. 93, § 1, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(10) added, (SB 22-140), ch. 357, p. 2565, § 16, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-140, see section 1 of chapter 357, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

23-3.3-1003. Colorado opportunity scholarship initiative - created.

There is created the Colorado opportunity scholarship initiative within the department. The executive director or the executive director's designee shall appoint the director of the initiative who shall administer the initiative in accordance with rules promulgated by the board pursuant to section 23-3.3-1004 (4).

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1384), ch. 347, p. 1555, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-006), ch. 26, p. 94, § 2, effective September 14.

23-3.3-1004. Colorado opportunity scholarship initiative advisory board - created - duties - rules - repeal.

There is created the Colorado opportunity scholarship initiative advisory board, which consists of fifteen members appointed as follows:

Seven persons to be appointed jointly by the executive director of the department of labor and employment or his or her designee and the executive director of the department of higher education or his or her designee, including:

One person representing the four-year research institutions of higher education in the state;

One person representing a four-year postsecondary institution in the state;

One person representing the community colleges and area technical colleges of the state;

One person representing workforce centers;

One person representing economic development corporations;

One person who is a current or former participant of the initiative for a two-year public institution of higher education; and

One person who is a current or former participant of the initiative for a four-year public institution of higher education; and

Four persons from the state work force development council created in section 24-46.3-101, to be appointed by the executive director of the department of labor and employment or his or her designee; and

Four persons, either commissioners of the Colorado commission on higher education created in section 23-1-102, members of the advisory committee to the Colorado commission on higher education created in section 23-1-103, or any combination thereof, to be appointed by the executive director of the department of higher education or his or her designee.

Notwithstanding subsection (1)(a) of this section, members of the board serving as of May 7, 2021, who were appointed by the governor continue to serve at the pleasure of the governor until the end of their term.

Except for the members described in subsection (1)(b)(I) of this section, the appointing authorities described in subsection (1)(a) of this section shall make their initial appointments to the board by August 1, 2021.

This subsection (1)(b) is repealed, effective July 1, 2025.

The members of the board shall elect presiding officers for the board, including a chair and vice-chair, from among the board members appointed pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, which presiding officers shall serve terms of two years. Board members may reelect a presiding officer.

Each member of the board serves at the pleasure of the member's appointing authority for a term of four years. The appointing authority may reappoint the member for an additional term or terms. Members of the board must receive seventy-five dollars per diem for attendance at official meetings plus reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the conduct of official business; except that a member shall not receive the per diem allowance provided for in this subsection (3) if the member receives a salary from the state for a full-time position with the state.

The board shall meet at least four times each year and shall carry out the following duties:

Promulgate rules for administration of the initiative, including but not limited to the following:

Criteria for eligibility of state agencies, nonprofit organizations, and public institutions of higher education to participate in the initiative;

Criteria for eligibility of students to apply for and receive grants from the initiative, which criteria shall include consideration of an applicant student's:

Courses of study;

Commitment to academic achievement;

Work experience;

Community involvement; and

Extracurricular activities;

Rules establishing permissible uses of grant and scholarship money from the initiative, which rules must stipulate that:

A portion of the money in the fund in any fiscal year may be awarded to state agencies and nonprofit organizations to assist such agencies and organizations with ensuring that student-success, precollegiate, postsecondary student support services are available to students who are classified as Colorado residents for tuition purposes; increasing the capacity for student support services at postsecondary institutions; and developing connections between local employers, public schools, precollegiate organizations, and postsecondary institutions;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2020.)

Any money appropriated to the fund that is not used for the purposes described in subsection (4)(a)(III)(A) of this section, to pay the direct and indirect costs of administering the initiative as described in section 23-3.3-1005 (4), or as otherwise provided in sections 23-3.3-1006 and 23-3.3-1007, must be used to build a financial corpus capable of providing financial assistance to eligible Colorado students in Colorado who will attend eligible institutions of higher education within the state. Financial assistance provided pursuant to this subsection (4)(a)(III)(C) may take the form of direct awards, matching incentives to create or increase the number of other scholarships, loans, or any combination thereof.

To the extent practicable, grants of financial assistance must be awarded to students representing rural and urban areas of the state and to students attending area technical colleges, community colleges, four-year institutions of higher education, and research institutions;

To the extent practicable, financial assistance must be evenly distributed between students with an expected family contribution of less than one hundred percent of the annual federal PELL grant award and students with an expected family contribution between one hundred percent and two hundred fifty percent of the annual federal PELL grant award; and

To the extent practicable, grant and scholarship money may be used for work-based learning;

Criteria for evaluating the effectiveness of the initiative in improving higher education outcomes in the state, which criteria must include, but need not be limited to:

Reductions in remediation rates and associated costs;

Increases in graduation rates;

Reductions in average time required to earn a degree;

Increases in student retention rates;

Reductions in disparities between the academic achievements of certain student populations based on demographic, geographic, and economic indicators;

Adoption of best practices for student support services;

Fulfillment of local workforce needs;

Reductions in student loan debt;

Improvements in tuition affordability; and

Improvements in students' access to federal grant programs and other federal sources of support for postsecondary students;

Identify and consider the feasibility of potential funding sources for the initiative, including but not limited to:

The implementation of an income tax credit for taxpayers of the state who elect to make a contribution to the fund; and

Any fundraising for the initiative that may result from a memorandum of understanding executed between the board and a nonprofit organization, as described in subsection (5) of this section; and

Prepare and submit an annual report concerning the initiative to the director. The director shall post the annual report on the department's website or appropriate online location, and, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I) to the contrary, shall send the annual report to the members of the education committees of the house of representatives and of the senate, or any successor committees.

The board may enter into a memorandum of understanding with a nonprofit organization for the purpose of raising moneys for the initiative.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1384), ch. 347, p. 1556, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2016:

(4)(a)(III)(C) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 765, § 43, effective June 6; (4)(a)(III)(D) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 153, § 46, effective August 10.

L. 2020:

IP(4), (4)(a)(III), and (4)(c) amended, (SB 20-006), ch. 26, p. 94, § 3, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, (SB 21-179), ch. 114, p. 444, § 1, effective May 7; (4)(a)(III)(C) amended, (HB 21-1330), ch. 377, p. 2494, § 3, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

IP(4), (4)(a)(III)(D), and (4)(a)(III)(E) amended and (4)(a)(III)(F) added, (SB 22-140), ch. 357, p. 2565, § 17, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1330, see section 1 of chapter 377, Session Laws of Colorado 2021. For the legislative declaration in SB 22-140, see section 1 of chapter 357, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

23-3.3-1005. Colorado opportunity scholarship initiative fund - created - rules - repeal.

There is created in the state treasury the Colorado opportunity scholarship initiative fund, which consists of:

Any moneys appropriated to the fund by the general assembly;

Any moneys transferred to the fund from any other fund; and

Any moneys received by the department as gifts, grants, or donations pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

The moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department for the purposes described in this part 10. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund must remain in the fund. Any unexpended or unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year must remain in the fund and not be transferred or credited to the general fund or another fund.

The department is authorized to accept any gifts, grants, or donations from any private or public source on behalf of the state for the purposes described in this part 10. The department shall transmit all such gifts, grants, and donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the fund.

The department is authorized to spend from the fund an amount of money equal to not more than seven and one-half percent of the total expenditures from the fund for the prior fiscal year to pay the direct and indirect costs of administering the initiative in any fiscal year; except that the general assembly may authorize additional spending for administrative costs in any fiscal year through a footnote in the annual general appropriation act.

The board may promulgate rules for the administration of the fund.

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate money from the workers, employers, and workforce centers cash fund, created in section 24-75-231, to the fund for the purposes described in section 23-3.3-1006. In addition to the amounts described in subsections (4) and (7) of this section, the department is authorized to spend up to five percent of the appropriated amount to pay the direct and indirect costs of administering the distribution of the amount described in this subsection (6) as provided in section 23-3.3-1006.

This subsection (6) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate from the workers, employers, and workforce centers cash fund, created in section 24-75-231, to the fund one million five hundred thousand dollars for the purposes described in section 23-3.3-1007. In addition to the amounts described in subsections (4) and (6) of this section, the department is authorized to spend from the appropriated amount up to one hundred thousand dollars annually for the costs incurred in implementing section 23-3.3-1007, which costs may include providing technical assistance, collecting and sharing best practices, and providing an evaluation of the student aid applications completion grant program in the annual report prepared pursuant to section 23-3.3-1004 (4)(c).

This subsection (7) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money appropriated to the fund pursuant to subsections (6)(a) and (7)(a) of this section to the state emergency fund created in section 24-77-104 (6)(a) in accordance with section 24-75-226 (4)(c)(II).

This subsection (8) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1384), ch. 347, p. 1558, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2020:

(4) amended, (SB 20-006), ch. 26, p. 95, § 4, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(6) and (7) added, (HB 21-1330), ch. 377, p. 2495, § 4, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

(8) added, (HB 22-1342), ch. 137, p. 920, § 4, effective April 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1330, see section 1 of chapter 377, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-3.3-1006. Colorado opportunity scholarship initiative - federal money - institutional allocations - purposes - reporting - rules - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Eligible student" means an undergraduate, in-state student who:

Earned some postsecondary credits from a public or private higher education institution but did not complete a credential requiring thirty credits or more before deciding not to enroll for two or more consecutive semesters; or

Was admitted to a public institution of higher education as a first-time student for the 2019-20 or 2020-21 academic year but did not enroll at any institution for the 2020-21 academic year.

"Public institution of higher education" or "institution" means a state institution of higher education identified in section 23-18-102 (10)(a), a local district college, or an area technical college.

"Student assistance plan" or "plan" means the proposal that a public institution of higher education develops as part of its application to the initiative to describe how the institution will spend the amount allocated to the institution pursuant to this section to assist eligible students in enrolling, persisting, and completing in alignment with the initiative's community partner program model.

As soon as practicable after June 29, 2021, the board shall publish a request for proposals that allocates the money appropriated to the fund pursuant to section 23-3.3-1005 (6) to the public institutions of higher education as provided in subsection (3) of this section. Each institution may receive up to one hundred percent of its allocation over two academic years beginning in the 2021-22 academic year by submitting a student assistance plan to the board as provided in subsection (4) of this section to use the money to support eligible students directly through scholarships, financial assistance for the cost of attendance, and other direct student financial incentives or assistance. The plan must also include indirect support for eligible students through student support services. The goal of each institution's student assistance plan must be to increase eligible student enrollment, persistence, and completion and, for institutions other than area technical colleges, reduce student debt.

The board shall allocate the money appropriated to the fund pursuant to section 23-3.3-1005 (6) to each public institution of higher education as follows:

Fifty percent based on each institution's headcount enrollment for the 2019-20 academic year of undergraduate, in-state students whose expected family contribution did not exceed two hundred fifty percent of the maximum Pell-eligible expected family contribution for a federal Pell grant and on other criteria adopted by rule as described in subsection (3)(b) of this section; and

Fifty percent based on each institution's full-time equivalent enrollment for the 2019-20 academic year of undergraduate, in-state students whose expected family contribution did not exceed two hundred fifty percent of the maximum Pell-eligible expected family contribution for a federal Pell grant and on other criteria adopted by rule as described in subsection (3)(b) of this section.

The board shall adopt rules that identify additional criteria for allocating the money appropriated to the fund pursuant to section 23-3.3-1005 (6), which criteria take into account characteristics of the public institutions of higher education, including location in a rural area of the state, total headcount enrollment, and characteristics unique to area technical colleges.

The board shall distribute all or a portion of an institution's allocation as soon as practicable after the board approves the institution's student assistance plan as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

To receive a distribution of the money allocated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, a public institution of higher education must submit to the board a student assistance plan describing the institution's intended use of the money to support eligible students. Each plan must be student-centered and, at a minimum, must specify:

The population of eligible students that the plan is designed to support, which may include traditional and nontraditional students and which should focus on disproportionately impacted student populations;

The percentage of the money distributed through the plan that will be distributed directly to eligible students in the form of scholarships, financial assistance for the cost of attendance, and other direct student financial incentives or assistance;

In alignment with the initiative's community partner program model, the student support services that the institution will provide using the remaining percentage of the amount distributed through the plan;

The amount of the institution's requested distribution and the timeline for receiving distributions of the allocation over the 2021-22 and 2022-23 academic years;

The specific, measurable goals that the institution expects to achieve through the plan, which goals must include increasing retention of the identified population of eligible students and must be otherwise aligned with increasing enrollment, persistence, and completion for said students and, for institutions other than area technical colleges, decreasing student debt for said students; and

The metrics and data that the institution will use to measure the degree of success in meeting the goals identified in the plan.

Each public institution of higher education shall submit its student assistance plan in accordance with rules promulgated by the board.

The board shall review each student assistance plan received pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. Before approving a student assistance plan, the board at a minimum must consider:

The percentage of the distribution that the public institution of higher education will spend as direct financial assistance to eligible students versus the percentage that the institution will spend in providing student support services, with the intent that a greater percentage is spent as scholarships, financial assistance for the cost of attendance, and other direct student financial incentives;

The population of eligible students that the plan is designed to support, including whether the plan includes traditional and nontraditional students and the degree to which the plan focuses on disproportionately impacted student populations;

The speed and efficiency with which the institution expects to distribute its money to eligible students; and

The quality of the plan, including the rigor of programming and quality of the evaluation measures, and the likelihood that the institution will meet the goals specified in the plan and that the plan will result in significant increases in eligible student enrollment, persistence, and completion and, for institutions other than area technical colleges, significant decreases in student debt.

Before approving a student assistance plan, the board may provide feedback to the submitting public institution of higher education, including suggested changes, and require the institution to revise and resubmit the plan.

At the end of the 2021-22 academic year, by a date set by board rule, each public institution of higher education shall submit a report to the board that specifies:

The amount of the institution's allocation that the institution spent during the 2021-22 academic year;

The specific purposes for which the money was spent, including the number of eligible students served, the amounts directly distributed to eligible students, and the student support services provided to eligible students;

The data identified in the institution's student assistance plan that demonstrates the institution's degree of success in meeting the goals identified in the plan;

Any other data that demonstrates the institution's progress toward and achievement of the goals of assisting eligible students to enroll, persist, and complete postsecondary credentials and, for institutions other than area technical colleges, decrease student debt;

Any other data related to the use of the money allocated to the institution that the board requests; and

If any portion of the institution's allocation remains undistributed, a request that the board distribute the remainder of the allocation and a description of any revisions to the institution's student assistance plan for spending the distribution.

The board shall review the reports received pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section and determine each institution's success in achieving the goals identified in the institution's plan. For each institution that requests the distribution of the remainder of the institution's allocation, the board shall review the institution's student assistance plan, including any revisions. Based on the criteria specified in subsection (5) of this section, the board may provide feedback and require changes to the plan before distributing the money to the institution for the 2022-23 academic year.

An institution that implements a student assistance plan during the 2022-23 academic year and that continues to implement the plan in subsequent academic years shall submit to the board, by a date specified by board rule, the report described in subsection (6)(a) of this section as it pertains to each academic year in which the plan continues to be implemented.

By December 1, 2022, and by December 1 each year thereafter so long as the board continues to receive reports pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, the director shall submit to the joint budget committee and to the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, a report that summarizes the reports received from the public institutions of higher education pursuant to subsection (6) of this section. The summary report must include, but need not be limited to:

The amounts allocated and distributed to each public institution of higher education;

The amount each institution spent in providing direct student financial assistance to eligible students and in providing services and support to eligible students and the types of direct student financial assistance and services and support provided;

The number of eligible students who re-enrolled in the academic years in which each institution's student assistance plan was implemented;

The postsecondary credentials awarded to eligible students who received assistance through each institution's student assistance plan; and

Any additional information the board deems useful in determining the degree to which the money appropriated to the fund pursuant to section 23-3.3-1005 (6) was successfully spent to increase eligible student enrollment, persistence, and completion and decrease student debt.

Notwithstanding the requirement in section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the requirement to submit the report required in this subsection (7) continues indefinitely.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1330), ch. 377, p. 2495, § 5, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

(1)(a)(I) amended, (SB 22-192), ch. 227, p. 1686, § 4, effective May 26.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1330, see section 1 of chapter 377, Session Laws of Colorado 2021. For the legislative declaration in SB 22-192, see section 1 of chapter 227, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

23-3.3-1007. Student aid applications completion grant program - created - applications - rules - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Application completion rate" means the percentage of students enrolled in a high school operated by a local education provider who complete the student aid applications in a single school year.

"Grant program" means the student aid applications completion grant program created in this section.

"Higher education institution" means a state institution of higher education as defined in section 23-18-102 (10)(a), a local district college created pursuant to article 71 of this title 23, an area technical college as defined in section 23-60-103, or a private institution of higher education as defined in section 23-18-102 (9).

"Local education provider" means a school district organized pursuant to article 30 of title 22, a charter school authorized by a school district pursuant to part 1 of article 30.5 of title 22, a charter school authorized by the state charter school institute pursuant to part 5 of article 30.5 of title 22, or a board of cooperative services created pursuant to article 5 of title 22 that operates a high school.

"Student aid applications" means the free application for federal student aid and the Colorado application for student financial aid.

There is created in the initiative the student aid applications completion grant program to provide assistance to local education providers in implementing strategies to increase the number of students enrolled by the local education provider who complete the student aid applications before graduating from high school. To be eligible to participate in the grant program, a local education provider must require students to complete the student aid applications before graduation unless the requirement is waived under conditions described by the local education provider.

A local education provider that seeks to participate in the grant program must submit an application to the board in accordance with timelines and procedures specified in rules of the board. At a minimum, the application must include:

The student aid application completion rate for high schools operated by the local education provider for the school year immediately preceding the application;

The local education provider's goal for increasing the student aid application completion rate;

The conditions under which the local education provider may waive the requirement that a student complete the student aid applications before graduating from high school;

Whether the local education provider is partnering or intends to partner with a community-based nonprofit organization or an institution of higher education to support students in completing the student aid applications; and

How the local education provider intends to use the money received through the grant program to increase the student aid application completion rate, which may include:

Strategies for increasing student and family awareness of the student aid applications and the benefits of completing them and the consequences of failing to complete them;

Strategies for increasing student and family awareness of the options for and costs of postsecondary enrollment and a variety of credential and degree programs and how these relate to completion of the student aid applications;

Hiring additional school counselors to assist students in completing the student aid applications; and

Strategies for increasing the number of students who apply to postsecondary education by encouraging students to complete admission applications in connection with completing the student aid applications.

The board shall review the applications received pursuant to this section and, subject to available appropriations, award the grants from money appropriated to the fund pursuant to section 23-3.3-1005 (7). In awarding grants, the board shall prioritize applicants that partner with one or more community-based nonprofit organizations or institutions of higher education in supporting student completion of student aid applications. Before awarding grants, the board shall consult with the department of education.

On or before August 1 immediately following completion of a school year in which a local education provider receives a grant through the grant program, the local education provider shall submit to the board a report specifying how the local education provider used the grant money to increase the student aid application completion rate and whether and to what degree the student aid application completion rate increased above the completion rate for the preceding school year.

On or before November 1, 2022, and on or before November 1 for each year in which a local education provider submits a report pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section, the board shall include in the annual report prepared pursuant to section 23-3.3-1004 (4)(c) a report that summarizes the reports received pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section. The board may include in the summary report recommendations concerning continuation of and changes to the grant program.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1330), ch. 377, p. 2495, § 5, effective June 29.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1330, see section 1 of chapter 377, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-3.3-1008. Displaced workers grant - repeal.

Pursuant to the initiative's intended purpose stated in section 23-3.3-1001 (1)(a) and authority granted in section 23-3.3-1004 (4)(a), the initiative may provide displaced workers grants for the purpose of supporting Coloradans displaced by the COVID-19 pandemic who have an incentive to reskill, upskill, or complete industry-recognized credentials in order to improve economic prospects for themselves or their communities. The initiative must disperse grant awards to grant recipients on an annual basis or more frequently, as determined by the executive director or the executive director's designee.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1192), ch. 10, p. 114, § 1, effective March 7.